test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-schetxwed_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - sčətxʷəd: # Noun 102 'eng bear' - full paradigm
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Sg+Nom: sčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: dsčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: adsčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSP3: sčətxʷəc
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: sčətxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [sčətxʷədləp, sčətxʷədlap]
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Distr+Nom: sčətčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Distr+Nom+PxSg1: dsčətčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Distr+Nom+PxSg2: adsčətčətxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Distr+Nom+PxSP3: sčətčətxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Distr+Nom+PxPl1: sčətčətxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Distr+Nom+PxPl2: [sčətčətxʷədləp, sčətčətxʷədlap]
# bear cubs seem to be regular derivation
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: sčičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: dsčičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: adsčičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxSP3: sčičtxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: sčičtxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: [sčičtxʷədləp, sčičtxʷədlap]
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Distr+Nom: sčičičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Distr+Nom+PxSg1: dsčičičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Distr+Nom+PxSg2: adsčičičtxʷəd
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Distr+Nom+PxSP3: sčičičtxʷəds
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Distr+Nom+PxPl1: sčičičtxʷədčəɬ
     sčətxʷəd+N+Msc+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Distr+Nom+PxPl2: [sčičičtxʷədləp, sčičičtxʷədlap]
